Montana, session 2025, HB656.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 39-51-409, MCA, is amended to read:
"39-51-409. Employment security account. (1) There is an account in the state special revenue
fund called the employment security account.
(2) Money deposited in the employment security account may be appropriated to the department
for payment of:
(a) unemployment insurance benefits;
(b) expenses incurred in the administration of the unemployment insurance program;
(c) expenses incurred in collecting money deposited in the account;
(d) expenses incurred for the employment offices established in 39-51-307, including expenses for
providing services to the business community;
(e) expenses incurred for the apprenticeship and training program and for the administration of 39-
71-319;
(f) expenses for displaced homemaker programs provided for under 39-7-305;
(g) expenses for department research and analysis functions that provide employment, wage, and
economic data;
(h) expenses for department functions pertaining to wage and hour laws, prevailing wages, and
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 656
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 656
collective bargaining; and
(i) principal, interest, and redemption premium on employment security revenue bonds authorized
in section 5, Chapter 435, Laws of 2009. ;
(j) expenses incurred in the administration of the office of community service established in 90-14-
103;
(k) expenses incurred in the administration and enforcement of state and federal laws that prohibit
unlawful discrimination ; and
(l) expenses incurred in the administration of education programs, grants for education programs,
and reentry programs administered by the department.
(3) Except as provided in sections 6 and 12, Chapter 435, Laws of 2009, the department may
transfer funds from the employment security account to the unemployment insurance fund account provided for
in 39-51-402 upon receiving approval from the budget director that the transfer will not decrease the money in
the account below the level appropriated by the legislature to provide for the employment services programs
identified in subsection (2).
(4) The department may transfer appropriation authority in employment services programs
between the federal special revenue and the state special revenue fund types."
Section 2. Section 90-14-103, MCA, is amended to read:
"90-14-103. Office of community service. (1) There is an office of community service, which is
headed by a director and established in the office of the governor department of labor and industry.
(2) The purpose of this office is to:
(a) renew the ethic of civic responsibility in the state;
(b) encourage the citizens of the state, regardless of age or income, to engage in full-time or part-
time service to the state;
(c) call young people to serve in projects that will benefit the state and improve their life chances
through the acquisition of literacy, job skills, and interpersonal skills;
(d) build on the existing organizational framework of state and local governmental entities to
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 656
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 656
expand full-time and part-time service opportunities in a wide variety of programs for all citizens, particularly
youth and older Montanans;
(e) involve participants in activities that would not otherwise be performed by employed workers;
and
(f) establish programs to accomplish labor-intensive improvements to public or low-income
properties or to provide services for the benefit of the state, its communities, and its people through service
contracts that specify the work to be performed.
(3) The director must be appointed by the governor, after consultation with the commission. The
director serves at the pleasure of the governor.
(4) The director, shall, with the advice of the commission, and in coordination with the department,
shall:
(a) assist the governor in the planning, coordination, operation, and evaluation of programs within
state government or under grants, donations, bequests, or other resources received by and administered
through state government for Montana community services. ;
(b) integrate and develop state plans for all services provided under this part, including but not
limited to the office of public instruction's service learning program, the Montana university system's innovative
projects, the department of military affairs' service involvement, and other community and volunteer service
programs; and
(5)(c) The director is responsible for the submission of submit applications for federal grants and for
funding from any other sources for the creation or operation of volunteer projects. The director shall ensure
accountability for all resources received.
(6) The director, together with the commission, shall integrate and develop state plans for all
services provided under this part, including but not limited to the office of public instruction's service learning
program, the Montana university system innovative projects, the department of military affairs' service
involvement, and other community and volunteer service programs."
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 656
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 656, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 656
INTRODUCED BY K. WALSH, E. BUTTREY, L. JONES, M. YAKAWICH, S. FITZPATRICK, J. ETCHART, K.
SEEKINS-CROWE
AN ACT REVISING THE USE OF THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ACCOUNT; TRANSFERRING THE OFFICE
OF COMMUNITY SERVICE TO THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY; AMENDING THE
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY ACCOUNT TO INCLUDE FUNDING OF THE OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICE,
COMMISSION FOR HUMAN RIGHTS, AND EDUCATION PROGRAMS, AND REENTRY PROGRAMS AS AN
ALLOWABLE USE; AND AMENDING SECTIONS 39-51-409 AND 90-14-103, MCA.”